Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-7,116
Rules and regulations.

The Director of Insurance may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations necessary to enforce the Step-Therapy Reform Act.

Laws 2021, LB337, § 6.
August 28, 2021